src/fst/overriding-exceptions.lexc
LEXICON afneg_0
 +Aff: #;
 +ConNeg: #;

LEXICON GI  ! liide gi/ki

@U.Cap.Obl@ GI';
GI';

LEXICON GI'
 +Foc/gi:Q1i #;
 #;

LEXICON Asendavad_erandid
 kohus+N+Sg+Par:kohust GI; ! paralleelvormi erand varjutab selle ka..
 ajama+V+Impers+Prs+Cond:aetaks GI; ! 27_V,aja,'ae[taks],-102-0--,-,-,*
 ajama+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff:aeti GI; ! 27_V,aja,'ae[ti],-120-1--,-,-,*
 ajama+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+ConNeg:aetud GI;
 ajama+V+Impers+Prt+Prc:aetud GI; ! 27_V,aja,'ae[tud],411--0--,-,-,*
 ajama+V+Impers+Prs+Quot:aetavat GI; ! 27_V,aja,'ae[tavat],-101-0--,-,-,*
 au+N+Sg+Par:au GI; ! 26_S,'au,'au[],------0P,-,-,*
 esi+N+Pl+Abe:eteta GI; ! 15_S,esi,e[teta],------1A,-,-,*
 esi+N+Pl+Ade:etel GI; ! 15_S,esi,e[tel],------15,-,-,*
 esi+N+Pl+Ela:etest GI; ! 15_S,esi,e[test],------13,-,-,*
 esi+N+Pl+Gen:ete GI; ! 15_S,esi,e[te],------1G,-,-,*
 esi+N+Pl+Ine:etes GI; ! 15_S,esi,e[tes],------12,-,-,*
 esi+N+Pl+Trm:eteni GI; ! 15_S,esi,e[teni],------1R,-,-,*
 esi+N+Sg+Ill:ette GI; ! 15_S,esi,'e[tte],------0D,-,-,*
 hea+A+Pl+Par:häid GI; ! 26_A,h'ea,h'ä[id],------1P,-,-,*
 jooksma+V+Impers+Prs+Cond+Aff:joostaks GI; ! 32_V,j'ooks,j'oos[taks],-102-0--,-,-,*
 jooksma+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt:joostagu GI; ! 32_V,j'ooks,j'oos[tagu],-103-0--,-,-,*
 jooksma+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff:joostakse GI; ! 32_V,j'ooks,j'oos[takse],-100-1--,-,-,*
 jooksma+V+Inf:joosta GI; ! 32_V,j'ooks,j'oos[ta],1-------,-,-,*
 jooksma+V+Impers+Prs+Prc:joostav GI; ! 32_V,j'ooks,j'oos[tav],410---0N,-,-,*
 jooksma+V+Impers+Prs+Quot:joostavat GI; ! 32_V,j'ooks,j'oos[tavat],-101-0--,-,-,*
 jääma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff:jäime GI; ! 37_V,j'ää,jä[ime],-02041--,-,-,*
 jääma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff:jäite GI; ! 37_V,j'ää,jä[ite],-02051--,-,-,*
 jääma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff:jäid GI; ! 37_V,j'ää,j'ä[id],-02061--,-,-,*
 kaitsma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff:kaitsesime GI; ! 32_V,k'aits,k'aitse[sime],-02041--,-,-,*
 kaitsma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff:kaitsesite GI; ! 32_V,k'aits,k'aitse[site],-02051--,-,-,*
 kaitsma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff:kaitsesid GI; ! 32_V,k'aits,k'aitse[sid],-02061--,-,-,*
 kiskuma+V+Impers+Prt+Cond+Aff:kistuks GI; ! 28_V,k'isku,k'is[tuks],-112-0--,-,-,*
 kiskuma+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt:kistagu GI; ! 28_V,k'isku,k'is[tagu],-103-0--,-,-,*
 kiskuma+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff:kistakse GI; ! 28_V,k'isku,k'is[takse],-100-1--,-,-,*
 kiskuma+V+Impers+Prt+Prc:kistud GI; ! 28_V,k'isku,k'is[tud],411--0--,-,-,*
 kiskuma+V+Impers+Prt+Quot:kistuvat GI; ! 28_V,k'isku,k'is[tuvat],-111-0--,-,-,*
 kiskuma+V+Impers+Sup:kistama GI; ! 28_V,k'isku,k'is[tama],31------,-,-,*
 kusema+V+Impers+Prt+Cond+Aff:kustuks GI; ! 36_V,kuse,k'us[tuks],-112-0--,-,-,*
 kusema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff:kusnuksin GI; ! 36_V,kuse,k'us[nuksin],-01211--,-,-,*
 kusema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff:kusnuksid GI; ! 36_V,kuse,k'us[nuksid],-01221--,-,-,*
 kusema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg3+Aff:kusnuks GI; ! 36_V,kuse,k'us[nuks],-01200--,-,-,*
 kusema+V+Ger:kustes GI; ! 36_V,kuse,k'us[tes],2-------,-,-,*
 kusema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1:kuskem GI; ! 36_V,kuse,k'us[kem],-00340--,-,-,*
 kusema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg3:kusku GI; ! 36_V,kuse,k'us[ku],-00300--,-,-,*
 kusema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff:kusime GI; ! 36_V,kuse,kus[ime],-02041--,-,-,*
 kusema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff:kusite GI; ! 36_V,kuse,kus[ite],-02051--,-,-,*
 kusema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff:kusid GI; ! 36_V,kuse,kus[id],-02061--,-,-,*
 kusema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff:kustakse GI; ! 36_V,kuse,k'us[takse],-100-1--,-,-,*
 kusema+V+Inf:kusta GI; ! 36_V,kuse,k'us[ta],1-------,-,-,*
 kusema+V+Pers+Prt+Prc:kusnud GI; ! 36_V,kuse,k'us[nud],401--0--,-,-,*
 kusema+V+Impers+Prt+Quot:kustuvat GI; ! 36_V,kuse,k'us[tuvat],-111-0--,-,-,*
 kusema+V+Impers+Prs+Quot:kustavat GI; ! 36_V,kuse,k'us[tavat],-101-0--,-,-,*
 kusi+N+Sg+Par:kust GI; ! 20_S,kusi,k'us[t],------0P,-,-,*
 käima+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff:käisin GI; ! 38_V,k'äi,käi[sin],-02011--,-,-,*
 käima+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff:käis GI; ! 38_V,k'äi,k'äi[s],-02031--,-,-,*
 käskima+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff:kästi GI; ! 28_V,k'äski,k'äs[ti],-120-1--,-,-,*
 käskima+V+Impers+Prs+Prc:kästav GI; ! 28_V,k'äski,k'äs[tav],410---0N,-,-,*
 kümmend+Num+Sg+Par:kümmend GI; ! 05_N,kümmend,kümmend[],------0P,-,-,*
 laskma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2:laske GI; ! 34_V,l'ask,l'as[ke],-00350--,-,-,*
 ligida+A+Sg+Nom:%{%} GI; ! 02_A,ligida,#,------0N,-,-,*
 maitsma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff:maitsesime GI; ! 32_V,m'aits,m'aitse[sime],-02041--,-,-,*
 maitsma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff:maitsesid GI; ! 32_V,m'aits,m'aitse[sid],-02061--,-,-,*
 muuma+V+Impers+Prs+Cond+Aff:muudaks GI; ! 27_V,m'uu,m'uu[daks],-102-0--,-,-,*
 muuma+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+ConNeg:muuda GI; ! 27_V,m'uu,m'uu[da],-100-0--,-,-,*
 muuma+V+Impers+Prs+Quot:muudavat GI; ! 27_V,m'uu,m'uu[davat],-101-0--,-,-,*
 määma+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt:määdagu GI; ! 27_V,m'ää,m'ää[dagu],-103-0--,-,-,*
 määma+V+Impers+Prt+Prc:määdud GI; ! 27_V,m'ää,m'ää[dud],411--0--,-,-,*
 määma+V+Impers+Sup:määdama GI; ! 27_V,m'ää,m'ää[dama],31------,-,-,*
 mõskma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg3:mõsku GI; ! 34_V,m'õsk,m'õs[ku],-00300--,-,-,*
 müüma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff:müüsite GI; ! 38_V,m'üü,müü[site],-02051--,-,-,*
 naine+N+Pl+Par:naisi GI; ! 12_S,naine,n'aisi[],------1P,-,-,*
 pea+N+Pl+Par:päid GI; ! 26_S,p'ea,p'ä[id],------1P,-,-,*
 pidama+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff:pidanuksin GI; ! 40_V,pida,pida[nuksin],-01211--,-,-,*
 pidama+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg3+Aff:pidanuks GI; ! 40_V,pida,pida[nuks],-01200--,-,-,*
 pidama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff:peaksin GI; ! 40_V,pida,p'ea[ksin],-00211--,-,-,*
 pidama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff:peaksid GI; ! 40_V,pida,p'ea[ksid],-00261--,-,-,*
 pidama+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt:%{%} afneg_0; ! 40_V,pida,#,-103-0--,-,-,*
 pidama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1:%{%} afneg_0; ! 40_V,pida,#,-00340--,-,-,*
 pidama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2:%{%} afneg_0; ! 40_V,pida,#,-00350--,-,-,*
 pidama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2:%{%} afneg_0; ! 40_V,pida,#,-00320--,-,-,*
 pidama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg3:%{%} afneg_0; ! 40_V,pida,#,-00300--,-,-,*
 pidama+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff:peeti GI; ! 28_V,pida,p'ee[ti],-120-1--,-,-,*
 pidama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff:pidid GI; ! 40_V,pida,pid[id],-02021--,-,-,*
 pidama+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff:peetakse GI; ! 28_V,pida,p'ee[takse],-100-1--,-,-,*
 pidama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff:peame GI; ! 40_V,pida,p'ea[me],-00041--,-,-,*
 pidama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff:peavad GI; ! 40_V,pida,p'ea[vad],-00061--,-,-,*
 pidama+V+Impers+Prt+Prc:peetud GI; ! 28_V,pida,p'ee[tud],411--0--,-,-,*
 pidama+V+Pers+Prs+Prc:%{%} GI; ! 40_V,pida,#,400---0N,-,-,*
 pidama+V+Impers+Prt+Quot:%{%} afneg_0; ! 40_V,pida,#,-111-0--,-,-,*
 pidama+V+Impers+Prs+Quot:%{%} afneg_0; ! 40_V,pida,#,-101-0--,-,-,*
 pidama+V+Pers+Prs+Quot:pidavat GI; ! 40_V,pida,pida[vat],-00100--,-,-,*
 pidama+V+Impers+Sup:%{%} GI; ! 40_V,pida,#,31------,-,-,*
 pooma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff:poosime GI; ! 38_V,p'oo,poo[sime],-02041--,-,-,*
 pooma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff:poosid GI; ! 38_V,p'oo,poo[sid],-02061--,-,-,*
 puskma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2:puske GI; ! 34_V,p'usk,p'us[ke],-00350--,-,-,*
 pügama+V+Impers+Prs+Cond+Aff:pöetaks GI; ! 28_V,püga,p'öe[taks],-102-0--,-,-,*
 pügama+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+ConNeg:pöeta GI; ! 28_V,püga,p'öe[ta],-100-0--,-,-,*
 pügama+V+Impers+Prs+Quot:pöetavat GI; ! 28_V,püga,p'öe[tavat],-101-0--,-,-,*
 saama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff:saite GI; ! 37_V,s'aa,sa[ite],-02051--,-,-,*
 süda+N+Sg+Par:südant GI; ! 04_S,süda,südan[t],------0P,-,-,*
 teine+Ord+Sg+Par:teist GI; ! 12_OP,teine,t'eis[t],------0P,-,-,*
 uni+N+Sg+Par:und GI; ! 20_S,uni,'un[d],------0P,-,-,*
 vedama+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff:veeti GI; ! 28_V,veda,v'ee[ti],-120-1--,-,-,*
 vedama+V+Impers+Prs+Prc:veetav GI; ! 28_V,veda,v'ee[tav],410---0N,-,-,*
 veri+N+Sg+Par:verd GI; ! 20_S,veri,v'er[d],------0P,-,-,*
 viima+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff:viisid GI; ! 38_V,v'ii,vii[sid],-02021--,-,-,*
 õitsma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff:õitsesin GI; ! 32_V,'õits,'õitse[sin],-02011--,-,-,*
 õitsma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff:õitses GI; ! 32_V,'õits,'õitse[s],-02031--,-,-,*
 öö+N+Pl+Abl:öödelt GI; ! 26_S,'öö,öö[delt],------16,-,-,*
 öö+N+Pl+All:öile GI; ! 26_S,'öö,'ö[ile],------14,-,-,*
 öö+N+Pl+Ela:öödest GI; ! 26_S,'öö,'öö[dest],------13,-,-,*
 öö+N+Pl+Ill:öödesse GI; ! 26_S,'öö,öö[desse],------11,-,-,*
 öö+N+Pl+Par:öid GI; ! 26_S,'öö,'ö[id],------1P,-,-,*
 öö+N+Pl+Tra:öödeks GI; ! 26_S,'öö,öö[deks],------1T,-,-,*
